Illinois, session 104th, HB2417.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Interstate Compact 6Act. 7    Section 5. Execution of compact. The Audiology and 8Speech-Language Pathology Interstate Compact is hereby enacted 9into law and entered into with any state, commonwealth, 10district or territory of the United States of America which 11legally joins in substantially the following form: 12"SECTION 1: PURPOSE13    The purpose of this Compact is to facilitate interstate 14practice of audiology and speech-language pathology with the 15goal of improving public access to audiology and 16speech-language pathology services. The practice of audiology 17and speech-language pathology occurs in the state where the 18patient/client/student is located at the time of the 19patient/client/student encounter. The Compact preserves the 20regulatory authority of states to protect public health and 21safety through the current system of state licensure.22    This Compact is designed to achieve the following   HB2417- 2 -LRB104 08038 AAS 18084 b1objectives:2        1. Increase public access to audiology and 3    speech-language pathology services by providing for the 4    mutual recognition of other member state licenses;5        2. Enhance the states' ability to protect the public's 6    health and safety;7        3. Encourage the cooperation of member states in 8    regulating multistate audiology and speech-language 9    pathology practice;10        4. Support spouses of relocating active duty military 11    personnel;12        5. Enhance the exchange of licensure, investigative 13    and disciplinary information between member states;14        6. Allow a remote state to hold a provider of services 15    with a compact privilege in that state accountable to that 16    state's practice standards; and17        7. Allow for the use of telehealth technology to 18    facilitate increased access to audiology and 19    speech-language pathology services.20SECTION 2: DEFINITIONS21    As used in this Compact, and except as otherwise provided, 22the following definitions shall apply:23    A. "Active duty military" means full-time duty status in 24the active uniformed service of the United States, including 25members of the National Guard and Reserve on active duty 26orders pursuant to 10 U.S.C. Section 1209 and 1211.  HB2417- 3 -LRB104 08038 AAS 18084 b1    B. "Adverse action" means any administrative, civil, 2equitable or criminal action permitted by a state's laws which 3is imposed by a licensing board or other authority against an 4audiologist or speech-language pathologist, including actions 5against an individual's license or privilege to practice such 6as revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of the 7licensee, or restriction on the licensee's practice.8    C. "Alternative program" means a non-disciplinary 9monitoring process approved by an audiology or speech-language 10pathology licensing board to address impaired practitioners.11    D. "Audiologist" means an individual who is licensed by a 12state to practice audiology.13    E. "Audiology" means the care and services provided by a 14licensed audiologist as set forth in the member state's 15statutes and rules.16    F. "Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Compact 17Commission" or "Commission" means the national administrative 18body whose membership consists of all states that have enacted 19the Compact.20    G. "Audiology and speech-language pathology licensing 21board," "audiology licensing board," "speech-language 22pathology licensing board," or "licensing board" means the 23agency of a state that is responsible for the licensing and 24regulation of audiologists and/or speech-language 25pathologists.26    H. "Compact privilege" means the authorization granted by   HB2417- 4 -LRB104 08038 AAS 18084 b1a remote state to allow a licensee from another member state to 2practice as an audiologist or speech-language pathologist in 3the remote state under its laws and rules. The practice of 4audiology or speech-language pathology occurs in the member 5state where the patient/client/student is located at the time 6of the patient/client/student encounter.7    I. "Current significant investigative information" means 8investigative information that a licensing board, after an 9inquiry or investigation that includes notification and an 10opportunity for the audiologist or speech-language pathologist 11to respond, if required by state law, has reason to believe is 12not groundless and, if proved true, would indicate more than a 13minor infraction.14    J. "Data system" means a repository of information about 15licensees, including, but not limited to, continuing 16education, examination, licensure, investigative, compact 17privilege and adverse action.18    K. "Encumbered license" means a license in which an 19adverse action restricts the practice of audiology or 20speech-language pathology by the licensee and said adverse 21action has been reported to the National Practitioners Data 22Bank (NPDB).23    L. "Executive Committee" means a group of directors 24elected or appointed to act on behalf of, and within the powers 25granted to them by, the Commission.26    M. "Home state" means the member state that is the   HB2417- 5 -LRB104 08038 AAS 18084 b1licensee's primary state of residence.2    N. "Impaired practitioner" means individuals whose 3professional practice is adversely affected by substance 4abuse, addiction, or other health-related conditions.5    O. "Licensee" means an individual who currently holds an 6authorization from the state licensing board to practice as an 7audiologist or speech-language pathologist.8    P. "Member state" means a state that has enacted the 9Compact.10    Q. "Privilege to practice" means a legal authorization 11permitting the practice of audiology or speech-language 12pathology in a remote state.13    R. "Remote state" means a member state other than the home 14state where a licensee is exercising or seeking to exercise 15the compact privilege.16    S. "Rule" means a regulation, principle or directive 17promulgated by the Commission that has the force of law.18    T. "Single-state license" means an audiology or 19speech-language pathology license issued by a member state 20that authorizes practice only within the issuing state and 21does not include a privilege to practice in any other member 22state.23    U. "Speech-language pathologist" means an individual who 24is licensed by a state to practice speech-language pathology.25    V. "Speech-language pathology" means the care and services 26provided by a licensed speech-language pathologist as set   HB2417- 6 -LRB104 08038 AAS 18084 b1forth in the member state's statutes and rules.2    W. "State" means any state, commonwealth, district or 3territory of the United States of America that regulates the 4practice of audiology and speech-language pathology.5    X. "State practice laws" means a member state's laws, 6rules and regulations that govern the practice of audiology or 7speech-language pathology, define the scope of audiology or 8speech-language pathology practice, and create the methods and 9grounds for imposing discipline.10    Y. "Telehealth" means the application of telecommunication 11technology to deliver audiology or speech-language pathology 12services at a distance for assessment, intervention and/or 13consultation.14SECTION 3. STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT15    A. A license issued to an audiologist or speech-language 16pathologist by a home state to a resident in that state shall 17be recognized by each member state as authorizing an 18audiologist or speech-language pathologist to practice 19audiology or speech-language pathology, under a privilege to 20practice, in each member state.21    B. A state must implement or utilize procedures for 22considering the criminal history records of applicants for 23initial privilege to practice. These procedures shall include 24the submission of fingerprints or other biometric-based 25information by applicants for the purpose of obtaining an 26applicant's criminal history record information from the   HB2417- 7 -LRB104 08038 AAS 18084 b1Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible for 2retaining that state's criminal records.3        1. A member state must fully implement a criminal 4    background check requirement, within a time frame 5    established by rule, by receiving the results of the 6    Federal Bureau of Investigation record search on criminal 7    background checks and use the results in making licensure 8    decisions.9        2. Communication between a member state, the 10    Commission and among member states regarding the 11    verification of eligibility for licensure through the 12    Compact shall not include any information received from 13    the Federal Bureau of Investigation relating to a federal 14    criminal records check performed by a member state under 15    Public Law 92-544.16    C. Upon application for a privilege to practice, the 17licensing board in the issuing remote state shall ascertain, 18through the data system, whether the applicant has ever held, 19or is the holder of, a license issued by any other state, 20whether there are any encumbrances on any license or privilege 21to practice held by the applicant, whether any adverse action 22has been taken against any license or privilege to practice 23held by the applicant.24    D. Each member state shall require an applicant to obtain 25or retain a license in the home state and meet the home state's 26qualifications for licensure or renewal of licensure, as well   HB2417- 8 -LRB104 08038 AAS 18084 b1as, all other applicable state laws.2    E. For an audiologist:3        1. Must meet one of the following educational 4    requirements:5            a. On or before, Dec. 31, 2007, has graduated with 6        a master's degree or doctorate in audiology, or 7        equivalent degree regardless of degree name, from a 8        program that is accredited by an accrediting agency 9        recognized by the Council for Higher Education 10        Accreditation, or its successor, or by the United 11        States Department of Education and operated by a 12        college or university accredited by a regional or 13        national accrediting organization recognized by the 14        board; or15            b. On or after, Jan. 1, 2008, has graduated with a 16        Doctoral degree in audiology, or equivalent degree, 17        regardless of degree name, from a program that is 18        accredited by an accrediting agency recognized by the 19        Council for Higher Education Accreditation, or its 20        successor, or by the United States Department of 21        Education and operated by a college or university 22        accredited by a regional or national accrediting 23        organization recognized by the board; or24            c. Has graduated from an audiology program that is 25        housed in an institution of higher education outside 26        of the United States (a) for which the program and   HB2417- 9 -LRB104 08038 AAS 18084 b1        institution have been approved by the authorized 2        accrediting body in the applicable country and (b) the 3        degree program has been verified by an independent 4        credentials review agency to be comparable to a state 5        licensing board-approved program.6        2. Has completed a supervised clinical practicum 7    experience from an accredited educational institution or 8    its cooperating programs as required by the Commission;9        3. Has successfully passed a national examination 10    approved by the Commission;11        4. Holds an active, unencumbered license;12        5. Has not been convicted or found guilty, and has not 13    entered into an agreed disposition, of a felony related to 14    the practice of speech-language pathology, under 15    applicable state or federal criminal law;16        6. Has a valid United States Social Security or 17    National Practitioner Identification number.18    F. For a speech-language pathologist:19        1. Must meet one of the following educational 20    requirements:21            a. Has graduated with a master's degree from a 22        speech-language pathology program that is accredited 23        by an organization recognized by the United States 24        Department of Education and operated by a college or 25        university accredited by a regional or national 26        accrediting organization recognized by the board; or   HB2417- 10 -LRB104 08038 AAS 18084 b1            b. Has graduated from a speech-language pathology 2        program that is housed in an institution of higher 3        education outside of the United States (a) for which 4        the program and institution have been approved by the 5        authorized accrediting body in the applicable country 6        and (b) the degree program has been verified by an 7        independent credentials review agency to be comparable 8        to a state licensing board-approved program.9        2. Has completed a supervised clinical practicum 10    experience from an educational institution or its 11    cooperating programs as required by the Commission;12        3. Has completed a supervised postgraduate 13    professional experience as required by the Commission;14        4. Has successfully passed a national examination 15    approved by the Commission;16        5. Holds an active, unencumbered license;17        6. Has not been convicted or found guilty, and has not 18    entered into an agreed disposition, of a felony related to 19    the practice of speech-language pathology, under 20    applicable state or federal criminal law;21        7. Has a valid United States Social Security or 22    National Practitioner Identification number.23    G. The privilege to practice is derived from the home 24state license.25    H. An audiologist or speech-language pathologist 26practicing in a member state must comply with the state   HB2417- 11 -LRB104 08038 AAS 18084 b1practice laws of the state in which the client is located at 2the time service is provided. The practice of audiology and 3speech-language pathology shall include all audiology and 4speech-language pathology practice as defined by the state 5practice laws of the member state in which the client is 6located. The practice of audiology and speech-language 7pathology in a member state under a privilege to practice 8shall subject an audiologist or speech-language pathologist to 9the jurisdiction of the licensing board, the courts and the 10laws of the member state in which the client is located at the 11time service is provided.12    I. Individuals not residing in a member state shall 13continue to be able to apply for a member state's single-state 14license as provided under the laws of each member state. 15However, the single-state license granted to these individuals 16shall not be recognized as granting the privilege to practice 17audiology or speech-language pathology in any other member 18state. Nothing in this Compact shall affect the requirements 19established by a member state for the issuance of a 20single-state license.21    J. Member states may charge a fee for granting a compact 22privilege.23    K. Member states must comply with the bylaws and rules and 24regulations of the Commission.25SECTION 4. COMPACT PRIVILEGE26    A. To exercise the compact privilege under the terms and   HB2417- 12 -LRB104 08038 AAS 18084 b1provisions of the Compact, the audiologist or speech-language 2pathologist shall:3        1. Hold an active license in the home state;4        2. Have no encumbrance on any state license;5        3. Be eligible for a compact privilege in any member 6    state in accordance with Section 3;7        4. Have not had any adverse action against any license 8    or compact privilege within the previous 2 years from date 9    of application;10        5. Notify the Commission that the licensee is seeking 11    the compact privilege within a remote state(s);12        6. Pay any applicable fees, including any state fee, 13    for the compact privilege;14        7. Report to the Commission adverse action taken by 15    any non-member state within 30 days from the date the 16    adverse action is taken.17    B. For the purposes of the compact privilege, an 18audiologist or speech-language pathologist shall only hold one 19home state license at a time.20    C. Except as provided in Section 6, if an audiologist or 21speech-language pathologist changes primary state of residence 22by moving between two-member states, the audiologist or 23speech-language pathologist must apply for licensure in the 24new home state, and the license issued by the prior home state 25shall be deactivated in accordance with applicable rules 26adopted by the Commission.  HB2417- 13 -LRB104 08038 AAS 18084 b1    D. The audiologist or speech-language pathologist may 2apply for licensure in advance of a change in primary state of 3residence.4    E. A license shall not be issued by the new home state 5until the audiologist or speech-language pathologist provides 6satisfactory evidence of a change in primary state of 7residence to the new home state and satisfies all applicable 8requirements to obtain a license from the new home state.9    F. If an audiologist or speech-language pathologist 10changes primary state of residence by moving from a member 11state to a non-member state, the license issued by the prior 12home state shall convert to a single-state license, valid only 13in the former home state.14    G. The compact privilege is valid until the expiration 15date of the home state license. The licensee must comply with 16the requirements of Section 4A to maintain the compact 17privilege in the remote state.18    H. A licensee providing audiology or speech-language 19pathology services in a remote state under the compact 20privilege shall function within the laws and regulations of 21the remote state.22    I. A licensee providing audiology or speech-language 23pathology services in a remote state is subject to that 24state's regulatory authority. A remote state may, in 25accordance with due process and that state's laws, remove a 26licensee's compact privilege in the remote state for a   HB2417- 14 -LRB104 08038 AAS 18084 b1specific period of time, impose fines, and/or take any other 2necessary actions to protect the health and safety of its 3citizens.4    J. If a home state license is encumbered, the licensee 5shall lose the compact privilege in any remote state until the 6following occur:7        1. The home state license is no longer encumbered; and8        2. Two years have elapsed from the date of the adverse 9    action.10    K. Once an encumbered license in the home state is 11restored to good standing, the licensee must meet the 12requirements of Section 4A to obtain a compact privilege in 13any remote state.14    L. Once the requirements of Section 4J have been met, the 15licensee must meet the requirements in Section 4A to obtain a 16compact privilege in a remote state.17SECTION 5. COMPACT PRIVILEGE TO PRACTICE TELEHEALTH18    Member states shall recognize the right of an audiologist 19or speech-language pathologist, licensed by a home state in 20accordance with Section 3 and under rules promulgated by the 21Commission, to practice audiology or speech-language pathology 22in any member state via telehealth under a privilege to 23practice as provided in the Compact and rules promulgated by 24the Commission.25SECTION 6. ACTIVE DUTY MILITARY PERSONNEL OR THEIR SPOUSES26    Active duty military personnel, or their spouse, shall   HB2417- 15 -LRB104 08038 AAS 18084 b1designate a home state where the individual has a current 2license in good standing. The individual may retain the home 3state designation during the period the service member is on 4active duty. Subsequent to designating a home state, the 5individual shall only change their home state through 6application for licensure in the new state.7SECTION 7. ADVERSE ACTIONS8    A. In addition to the other powers conferred by state law, 9a remote state shall have the authority, in accordance with 10existing state due process law, to:11        1. Take adverse action against an audiologist's or 12    speech-language pathologist's privilege to practice within 13    that member state.14        2. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and 15    investigations that require the attendance and testimony 16    of witnesses as well as the production of evidence. 17    Subpoenas issued by a licensing board in a member state 18    for the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the 19    production of evidence from another member state shall be 20    enforced in the latter state by any court of competent 21    jurisdiction, according to the practice and procedure of 22    that court applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings 23    pending before it. The issuing authority shall pay any 24    witness fees, travel expenses, mileage and other fees 25    required by the service statutes of the state in which the 26    witnesses or evidence are located.  HB2417- 16 -LRB104 08038 AAS 18084 b1        3. Only the home state shall have the power to take 2    adverse action against an audiologist's or speech-language 3    pathologist's license issued by the home state.4    B. For purposes of taking adverse action, the home state 5shall give the same priority and effect to reported conduct 6received from a member state as it would if the conduct had 7occurred within the home state. In so doing, the home state 8shall apply its own state laws to determine appropriate 9action.10    C. The home state shall complete any pending 11investigations of an audiologist or speech-language 12pathologist who changes primary state of residence during the 13course of the investigations. The home state shall also have 14the authority to take appropriate action(s) and shall promptly 15report the conclusions of the investigations to the 16administrator of the data system. The administrator of the 17coordinated licensure information system shall promptly notify 18the new home state of any adverse actions.19    D. If otherwise permitted by state law, the member states 20may recover from the affected audiologist or speech-language 21pathologist the costs of investigations and disposition of 22cases resulting from any adverse action taken against that 23audiologist or speech-language pathologist.24    E. Take adverse action based on the factual findings of 25the remote state, provided that the member state follows the 26member state's own procedures for taking the adverse action.  HB2417- 17 -LRB104 08038 AAS 18084 b1    F. Joint Investigations.2        1. In addition to the authority granted to a member 3    state by its respective audiology or speech-language 4    pathology practice act or other applicable state law, any 5    member state may participate with other member states in 6    joint investigations of licensees.7        2. Member states shall share any investigative, 8    litigation, or compliance materials in furtherance of any 9    joint or individual investigation initiated under the 10    Compact.11    G. If adverse action is taken by the home state against an 12audiologist's or speech language pathologist's license, the 13audiologist's or speech-language pathologist's privilege to 14practice in all other member states shall be deactivated until 15all encumbrances have been removed from the state license. All 16home state disciplinary orders that impose adverse action 17against an audiologist's or speech language pathologist's 18license shall include a statement that the audiologist's or 19speech-language pathologist's privilege to practice is 20deactivated in all member states during the pendency of the 21order.22    H. If a member state takes adverse action, it shall 23promptly notify the administrator of the data system. The 24administrator of the data system shall promptly notify the 25home state of any adverse actions by remote states.26    I. Nothing in this Compact shall override a member state's   HB2417- 18 -LRB104 08038 AAS 18084 b1decision that participation in an alternative program may be 2used in lieu of adverse action.3SECTION 8. ESTABLISHMENT OF THE AUDIOLOGY AND SPEECH-LANGUAGE 4PATHOLOGY COMPACT COMMISSION5    A. The Compact member states hereby create and establish a 6joint public agency known as the Audiology and Speech-Language 7Pathology Compact Commission:8        1. The Commission is an instrumentality of the Compact 9    states. 10        2. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or 11    against the Commission shall be brought solely and 12    exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the 13    principal office of the Commission is located. The 14    Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to 15    the extent it adopts or consents to participate in 16    alternative dispute resolution proceedings.17        3. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a 18    waiver of sovereign immunity.19    B. Membership, Voting and Meetings.20        1. Each member state shall have two (2) delegates 21    selected by that member state's licensing board. The 22    delegates shall be current members of the licensing board. 23    One shall be an audiologist and one shall be a 24    speech-language pathologist.25        2. An additional five (5) delegates, who are either a 26    public member or board administrator from a state   HB2417- 19 -LRB104 08038 AAS 18084 b1    licensing board, shall be chosen by the Executive 2    Committee from a pool of nominees provided by the 3    Commission at Large.4        3. Any delegate may be removed or suspended from 5    office as provided by the law of the state from which the 6    delegate is appointed.7        4. The member state board shall fill any vacancy 8    occurring on the Commission, within 90 days.9        5. Each delegate shall be entitled to one (1) vote 10    with regard to the promulgation of rules and creation of 11    bylaws and shall otherwise have an opportunity to 12    participate in the business and affairs of the Commission.13        6. A delegate shall vote in person or by other means as 14    provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for 15    delegates' participation in meetings by telephone or other 16    means of communication.17        7. The Commission shall meet at least once during each 18    calendar year. Additional meetings shall be held as set 19    forth in the bylaws.20    C. The Commission shall have the following powers and 21duties:22        1. Establish the fiscal year of the Commission;23        2. Establish bylaws;24        3. Establish a Code of Ethics;25        4. Maintain its financial records in accordance with 26    the bylaws;  HB2417- 20 -LRB104 08038 AAS 18084 b1        5. Meet and take actions as are consistent with the 2    provisions of this Compact and the bylaws;3        6. Promulgate uniform rules to facilitate and 4    coordinate implementation and administration of this 5    Compact. The rules shall have the force and effect of law 6    and shall be binding in all member states;7        7. Bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in 8    the name of the Commission, provided that the standing of 9    any state audiology or speech-language pathology licensing 10    board to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be 11    affected;12        8. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;13        9. Borrow, accept, or contract for services of 14    personnel, including, but not limited to, employees of a 15    member state;16        10. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix 17    compensation, define duties, grant individuals appropriate 18    authority to carry out the purposes of the Compact, and to 19    establish the Commission's personnel policies and programs 20    relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of 21    personnel, and other related personnel matters;22        11. Accept any and all appropriate donations and 23    grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials and 24    services, and to receive, utilize and dispose of the same; 25    provided that at all times the Commission shall avoid any 26    appearance of impropriety and/or conflict of interest;  HB2417- 21 -LRB104 08038 AAS 18084 b1        12. Lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or 2    donations of, or otherwise to own, hold, improve or use, 3    any property, real, personal or mixed; provided that at 4    all times the Commission shall avoid any appearance of 5    impropriety;6        13. Sell convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, 7    abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property real, 8    personal, or mixed;9        14. Establish a budget and make expenditures;10        15. Borrow money;11        16. Appoint committees, including standing committees 12    composed of members, and other interested persons as may 13    be designated in this Compact and the bylaws;14        17. Provide and receive information from, and 15    cooperate with, law enforcement agencies;16        18. Establish and elect an Executive Committee; and 17        19. Perform other functions as may be necessary or 18    appropriate to achieve the purposes of this Compact 19    consistent with the state regulation of audiology and 20    speech-language pathology licensure and practice.21    D. The Executive Committee. The Executive Committee shall 22have the power to act on behalf of the Commission according to 23the terms of this Compact:24        1. The Executive Committee shall be composed of ten 25    (10) members:26            a. Seven (7) voting members who are elected by the   HB2417- 22 -LRB104 08038 AAS 18084 b1        Commission from the current membership of the 2        Commission;3            b. Two (2) ex-officios, consisting of one 4        nonvoting member from a recognized national audiology 5        professional association and one nonvoting member from 6        a recognized national speech-language pathology 7        association; and8            c. One (1) ex-officio, nonvoting member from the 9        recognized membership organization of the audiology 10        and speech-language pathology licensing boards.11    E. The ex-officio members shall be selected by their 12respective organizations.13        1. The Commission may remove any member of the 14    Executive Committee as provided in bylaws.15        2. The Executive Committee shall meet at least 16    annually.17        3. The Executive Committee shall have the following 18    duties and responsibilities:19            a. Recommend to the entire Commission changes to 20        the rules or bylaws, changes to this Compact 21        legislation, fees paid by Compact member states such 22        as annual dues, and any commission Compact fee charged 23        to licensees for the compact privilege;24            b. Ensure Compact administration services are 25        appropriately provided, contractual or otherwise;26            c. Prepare and recommend the budget;  HB2417- 23 -LRB104 08038 AAS 18084 b1            d. Maintain financial records on behalf of the 2        Commission;3            e. Monitor Compact compliance of member states and 4        provide compliance reports to the Commission;5            f. Establish additional committees as necessary; 6        and 7            g. Other duties as provided in rules or bylaws.8        4. Meetings of the Commission. All meetings shall be 9    open to the public, and public notice of meetings shall be 10    given in the same manner as required under the rulemaking 11    provisions in Section 10.12        5. The Commission or the Executive Committee or other 13    committees of the Commission may convene in a closed, 14    non-public meeting if the Commission or Executive 15    Committee or other committees of the Commission must 16    discuss:17            a. Non-compliance of a member state with its 18        obligations under the Compact;19            b. The employment, compensation, discipline or 20        other matters, practices or procedures related to 21        specific employees or other matters related to the 22        Commission's internal personnel practices and 23        procedures;24            c. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated 25        litigation;26            d. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase,   HB2417- 24 -LRB104 08038 AAS 18084 b1        lease, or sale of goods, services, or real estate;2            e. Accusing any person of a crime or formally 3        censuring any person;4            f. Disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or 5        financial information that is privileged or 6        confidential;7            g. Disclosure of information of a personal nature 8        where disclosure would constitute a clearly 9        unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;10            h. Disclosure of investigative records compiled 11        for law enforcement purposes;12            i. Disclosure of information related to any 13        investigative reports prepared by or on behalf of or 14        for use of the Commission or other committee charged 15        with responsibility of investigation or determination 16        of compliance issues pursuant to the Compact; or17            j. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure 18        by federal or member state statute.19        6. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed 20    pursuant to this provision, the Commission's legal counsel 21    or designee shall certify that the meeting may be closed 22    and shall reference each relevant exempting provision. 23        7. The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and 24    clearly describe all matters discussed in a meeting and 25    shall provide a full and accurate summary of actions 26    taken, and the reasons therefore, including a description   HB2417- 25 -LRB104 08038 AAS 18084 b1    of the views expressed. All documents considered in 2    connection with an action shall be identified in minutes. 3    All minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall remain 4    under seal, subject to release by a majority vote of the 5    Commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.6        8. Financing of the Commission.7            a. The Commission shall pay, or provide for the 8        payment of, the reasonable expenses of its 9        establishment, organization, and ongoing activities.10            b. The Commission may accept any and all 11        appropriate revenue sources, donations, and grants of 12        money, equipment, supplies, materials, and services.13            c. The Commission may levy on and collect an 14        annual assessment from each member state or impose 15        fees on other parties to cover the cost of the 16        operations and activities of the Commission and its 17        staff, which must be in a total amount sufficient to 18        cover its annual budget as approved each year for 19        which revenue is not provided by other sources. The 20        aggregate annual assessment amount shall be allocated 21        based upon a formula to be determined by the 22        Commission, which shall promulgate a rule binding upon 23        all member states.24        9. The Commission shall not incur obligations of any 25    kind prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the 26    same; nor shall the Commission pledge the credit of any of   HB2417- 26 -LRB104 08038 AAS 18084 b1    the member states, except by and with the authority of the 2    member state.3        10. The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all 4    receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements 5    of the Commission shall be subject to the audit and 6    accounting procedures established under its bylaws. 7    However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled 8    by the Commission shall be audited yearly by a certified 9    or licensed public accountant, and the report of the audit 10    shall be included in and become part of the annual report 11    of the Commission.12    F. Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification.13        1. The members, officers, executive director, 14    employees and representatives of the Commission shall be 15    immune from suit and liability, either personally or in 16    their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or 17    loss of property or personal injury or other civil 18    liability caused by or arising out of any actual or 19    alleged act, error or omission that occurred, or that the 20    person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable 21    basis for believing occurred within the scope of 22    Commission employment, duties or responsibilities; 23    provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be construed 24    to protect any person from suit and/or liability for any 25    damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the 26    intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that   HB2417- 27 -LRB104 08038 AAS 18084 b1    person.2        2. The Commission shall defend any member, officer, 3    executive director, employee or representative of the 4    Commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability 5    arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or 6    omission that occurred within the scope of Commission 7    employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that the 8    person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable 9    basis for believing occurred within the scope of 10    Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; 11    provided that nothing herein shall be construed to 12    prohibit that person from retaining his or her own 13    counsel; and provided further, that the actual or alleged 14    act, error, or omission did not result from that person's 15    intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.16        3. The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless 17    any member, officer, executive director, employee, or 18    representative of the Commission for the amount of any 19    settlement or judgment obtained against that person 20    arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or 21    omission that occurred within the scope of Commission 22    employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that person 23    had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the 24    scope of Commission employment, duties, or 25    responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, 26    error, or omission did not result from the intentional or   HB2417- 28 -LRB104 08038 AAS 18084 b1    willful or wanton misconduct of that person.2SECTION 9. DATA SYSTEM3    A. The Commission shall provide for the development, 4maintenance, and utilization of a coordinated database and 5reporting system containing licensure, adverse action, and 6investigative information on all licensed individuals in 7member states.8    B. Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the 9contrary, a member state shall submit a uniform data set to the 10data system on all individuals to whom this Compact is 11applicable as required by the rules of the Commission, 12including:13        1. Identifying information;14        2. Licensure data;15        3. Adverse actions against a license or compact 16    privilege;17        4. Non-confidential information related to alternative 18    program participation;19        5. Any denial of application for licensure, and the 20    reason(s) for denial; and21        6. Other information that may facilitate the 22    administration of this Compact, as determined by the rules 23    of the Commission.24    C. Investigative information pertaining to a licensee in 25any member state shall only be available to other member 26states.  HB2417- 29 -LRB104 08038 AAS 18084 b1    D. The Commission shall promptly notify all member states 2of any adverse action taken against a licensee or an 3individual applying for a license. Adverse action information 4pertaining to a licensee in any member state shall be 5available to any other member state.6    E. Member states contributing information to the data 7system may designate information that may not be shared with 8the public without the express permission of the contributing 9state.10    F. Any information submitted to the data system that is 11subsequently required to be expunged by the laws of the member 12state contributing the information shall be removed from the 13data system.14SECTION 10. RULEMAKING15    A. The Commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers 16pursuant to the criteria set forth in this Section and the 17rules adopted thereunder. Rules and amendments shall become 18binding as of the date specified in each rule or amendment.19    B. If a majority of the legislatures of the member states 20rejects a rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the 21same manner used to adopt the Compact within 4 years of the 22date of adoption of the rule, the rule shall have no further 23force and effect in any member state.24    C. Rules or amendments to the rules shall be adopted at a 25regular or special meeting of the Commission.26    D. Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final rule or   HB2417- 30 -LRB104 08038 AAS 18084 b1rules by the Commission, and at least thirty (30) days in 2advance of the meeting at which the rule shall be considered 3and voted upon, the Commission shall file a Notice of Proposed 4Rulemaking:5        1. On the website of the Commission or other publicly 6    accessible platform; and7        2. On the website of each member state audiology or 8    speech-language pathology licensing board or other 9    publicly accessible platform or the publication in which 10    each state would otherwise publish proposed rules.11    E. The Notice of Proposed Rulemaking shall include:12        1. The proposed time, date, and location of the 13    meeting in which the rule shall be considered and voted 14    upon;15        2. The text of the proposed rule or amendment and the 16    reason for the proposed rule;17        3. A request for comments on the proposed rule from 18    any interested person; and19        4. The manner in which interested persons may submit 20    notice to the Commission of their intention to attend the 21    public hearing and any written comments.22    F. Prior to the adoption of a proposed rule, the 23Commission shall allow persons to submit written data, facts, 24opinions and arguments, which shall be made available to the 25public.26    G. The Commission shall grant an opportunity for a public   HB2417- 31 -LRB104 08038 AAS 18084 b1hearing before it adopts a rule or amendment if a hearing is 2requested by:3        1. At least twenty-five (25) persons;4        2. A state or federal governmental subdivision or 5    agency; or6        3. An association having at least twenty-five (25) 7    members.8    H. If a hearing is held on the proposed rule or amendment, 9the Commission shall publish the place, time, and date of the 10scheduled public hearing. If the hearing is held via 11electronic means, the Commission shall publish the mechanism 12for access to the electronic hearing. 13        1. All persons wishing to be heard at the hearing 14    shall notify the executive director of the Commission or 15    other designated member in writing of their desire to 16    appear and testify at the hearing not less than five (5) 17    business days before the scheduled date of the hearing.18        2. Hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing 19    each person who wishes to comment a fair and reasonable 20    opportunity to comment orally or in writing.21        3. All hearings shall be recorded. A copy of the 22    recording shall be made available on request.23        4. Nothing in this section shall be construed as 24    requiring a separate hearing on each rule. Rules may be 25    grouped for the convenience of the Commission at hearings 26    required by this section.  HB2417- 32 -LRB104 08038 AAS 18084 b1    I. Following the scheduled hearing date, or by the close 2of business on the scheduled hearing date if the hearing was 3not held, the Commission shall consider all written and oral 4comments received.5    J. If no written notice of intent to attend the public 6hearing by interested parties is received, the Commission may 7proceed with promulgation of the proposed rule without a 8public hearing.9    K. The Commission shall, by majority vote of all members, 10take final action on the proposed rule and shall determine the 11effective date of the rule, if any, based on the rulemaking 12record and the full text of the rule.13    L. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the 14Commission may consider and adopt an emergency rule without 15prior notice, opportunity for comment, or hearing, provided 16that the usual rulemaking procedures provided in the Compact 17and in this section shall be retroactively applied to the rule 18as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety 19(90) days after the effective date of the rule. For the 20purposes of this provision, an emergency rule is one that must 21be adopted immediately in order to:22        1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, 23    or welfare;24        2. Prevent a loss of Commission or member state funds; 25    or26        3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an   HB2417- 33 -LRB104 08038 AAS 18084 b1    administrative rule that is established by federal law or 2    rule.3    M. The Commission or an authorized committee of the 4Commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted rule 5or amendment for purposes of correcting typographical errors, 6errors in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical 7errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the 8website of the Commission. The revision shall be subject to 9challenge by any person for a period of thirty (30) days after 10posting. The revision may be challenged only on grounds that 11the revision results in a material change to a rule. A 12challenge shall be made in writing and delivered to the chair 13of the Commission prior to the end of the notice period. If no 14challenge is made, the revision shall take effect without 15further action. If the revision is challenged, the revision 16may not take effect without the approval of the Commission.17SECTION 11. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT18    A. Dispute Resolution.19        1. Upon request by a member state, the Commission 20    shall attempt to resolve disputes related to the Compact 21    that arise among member states and between member and 22    non-member states.23        2. The Commission shall promulgate a rule providing 24    for both mediation and binding dispute resolution for 25    disputes as appropriate.26    B. Enforcement.  HB2417- 34 -LRB104 08038 AAS 18084 b1        1. The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its 2    discretion, shall enforce the provisions and rules of this 3    Compact.4        2. By majority vote, the Commission may initiate legal 5    action in the United States District Court for the 6    District of Columbia or the federal district where the 7    Commission has its principal offices against a member 8    state in default to enforce compliance with the provisions 9    of the Compact and its promulgated rules and bylaws. The 10    relief sought may include both injunctive relief and 11    damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, 12    the prevailing member shall be awarded all costs of 13    litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees.14        3. The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive 15    remedies of the Commission. The Commission may pursue any 16    other remedies available under federal or state law.17SECTION 12. DATE OF IMPLEMENTATION OF THE INTERSTATE 18COMMISSION FOR AUDIOLOGY AND SPEECH-LANGUAGE PATHOLOGY 19PRACTICE AND ASSOCIATED RULES, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT20    A. The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which 21the Compact statute is enacted into law in the 10th member 22state. The provisions, which become effective at that time, 23shall be limited to the powers granted to the Commission 24relating to assembly and the promulgation of rules. 25Thereafter, the Commission shall meet and exercise rulemaking 26powers necessary to the implementation and administration of   HB2417- 35 -LRB104 08038 AAS 18084 b1the Compact.2    B. Any state that joins the Compact subsequent to the 3Commission's initial adoption of the rules shall be subject to 4the rules as they exist on the date on which the Compact 5becomes law in that state. Any rule that has been previously 6adopted by the Commission shall have the full force and effect 7of law on the day the Compact becomes law in that state.8    C. Any member state may withdraw from this Compact by 9enacting a statute repealing the same.10        1. A member state's withdrawal shall not take effect 11    until six (6) months after enactment of the repealing 12    statute.13        2. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing 14    requirement of the withdrawing state's audiology or 15    speech-language pathology licensing board to comply with 16    the investigative and adverse action reporting 17    requirements of this act prior to the effective date of 18    withdrawal.19    D. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to 20invalidate or prevent any audiology or speech-language 21pathology licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement 22between a member state and a non-member state that does not 23conflict with the provisions of this Compact.24    E. This Compact may be amended by the member states. No 25amendment to this Compact shall become effective and binding 26upon any member state until it is enacted into the laws of all   HB2417- 36 -LRB104 08038 AAS 18084 b1member states.2SECTION 13. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY3    This Compact shall be liberally construed so as to 4effectuate the purposes thereof. The provisions of this 5Compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence 6or provision of this Compact is declared to be contrary to the 7constitution of any member state or of the United States or the 8applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or 9circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of 10this Compact and the applicability thereof to any government, 11agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. 12If this Compact shall be held contrary to the constitution of 13any member state, the Compact shall remain in full force and 14effect as to the remaining member states and in full force and 15effect as to the member state affected as to all severable 16matters.17SECTION 14. BINDING EFFECT OF COMPACT AND OTHER LAWS18    A. Nothing herein prevents the enforcement of any other 19law of a member state that is not inconsistent with the 20Compact.21    B. All laws in a member state in conflict with the Compact 22are superseded to the extent of the conflict.23    C. All lawful actions of the Commission, including all 24rules and bylaws promulgated by the Commission, are binding 25upon the member states.26    D. All agreements between the Commission and the member   HB2417- 37 -LRB104 08038 AAS 18084 b1states are binding in accordance with their terms.2    E. In the event any provision of the Compact exceeds the 3constitutional limits imposed on the legislature of any member 4state, the provision shall be ineffective to the extent of the 5conflict with the constitutional provision in question in that 6member state." 7    Section 10. The Illinois Speech-Language Pathology and 8Audiology Practice Act is amended by adding Section 4.3 as 9follows: 10    (225 ILCS 110/4.3 new)11    Sec. 4.3. Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology 12Interstate Compact Act. If the Audiology and Speech-Language 13Pathology Interstate Compact becomes law as provided in 14Section 5 of the Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology 15Interstate Compact Act, the Department shall revise its rules 16related to implementing and enforcing the Illinois 17Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology Practice Act to be in 18conformance with the Compact, if necessary. The Department 19shall also make recommendations in a report to the General 20Assembly as to what portions of this Act and other laws should 21be modified, if at all, to be consistent with the Compact."